kurjmorph/src/foma/vj.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl DI+ @P.DI.ON@ @D.DI@ @C.DI@

LEXICON Root
@P.DI.ON@DI+:@P.DI.ON@di	DiVStem;
VRoot;

LEXICON DiVStem
+PresentAspect:0 VRoot;

LEXICON VRoot
ajot VStem;
revi VStem;


LEXICON VStem
+V:0  #;
